src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PROG-yi-tsazid_wake-up_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ts'ázíd[wake-up] :
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjSg1:       ts'áyissíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjSg2:       ts'áyízíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjSg3:       ts'áyizíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1:       [ts'áyiìzíł, ts'áyaàzíł]
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1+Distr: [ts'ádàyiìzíł, ts'ádàyaàzíł]
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2:       ts'áyassíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2+Distr: ts'ádàyassíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3:       ts'ágázíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3+Distr: ts'ádàgázíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4:       ts'áts'ázíł
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4+Distr: ts'ádàts'ázíł
